New York, session 2025-2026, S6390.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 112 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. The commissioner shall make correctional facility water testing 4 results accessible directly, upon request, to incarcerated individuals 5 and correctional facility staff in such facilities and shall make such 6 water testing results available to the public on the website of the 7 department. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08890-03-6